Alaska statutes. Title 16. Fish and Game.
Article 1. State Game Refuges.

Opinions of attorney general. —

For a discussion of the authority of the Department of Natural Resources and the Department of Fish and Game, see November 8, 1985 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 16.20.010.
Legislative recognition; prohibition against ceding state authority.

The legislature recognizes that

the state has jurisdiction over all fish and game in the state except in those areas where it has assented to federal control;

the state has not assented to federal control of fish and game in

those areas that were set apart as National Bird and Wildlife Refuges while the state was a United States territory; and

Glacier Bay National Park and Preserve or the navigable waters within or adjoining the park and preserve;

special recognition of the value to the state and the nation of areas of unspoiled habitat and the game characteristic to it will be demonstrated by designating as state game refuges those federal lands that were National Bird and Wildlife Refuges or Ranges at the time that Alaska achieved statehood.

[Renumbered as AS

16.05.935(a)

].

[Renumbered as AS

16.05.935(b)

].

History.

(§ 1 ch 114 SLA 1960; am §§ 2, 3 ch 56 SLA 1999; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 2003)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2,
ch. 95, SLA 2003, directs that “[a]n agreement, or a severable portion of an agreement, between the Department of Fish and Game, the Board of Fisheries, or the Board of Game and a department or agency of the federal government that was entered into before September 14, 2003, and that cedes any state authority for the management of fish and game in the state to the federal government, is void on and after July 1, 2004.”

Collateral references. —

38 C.J.S., Game, §§ 7, 8, 15.

Sec. 16.20.020.
Purpose.

The purpose of AS

16.20.010

—

16.20.080

is to protect and preserve the natural habitat and game population in certain designated areas of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 114 SLA 1960)

Administrative Code. —

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

Sec. 16.20.030.
National wildlife refuges designated as state game refuges; Goose Bay State Game Refuge.

The land areas now included in the National Wildlife Refuge System that are cited in this subsection are designated as state game refuges, and the board shall assign them appropriate refuge names:

Aleutian Islands Refuge (except Umnak, Unalaska, Akun, Akutan, Sanak, and Tigalda Islands);

Bering Sea Refuge (St. Matthews and Hall Islands, and Pinnacle Islet in Bering Sea);

Bogoslof Island Refuge;

Chamisso Island Refuge;

Forrester Island Refuge;

Hazen Bay (Nunivakchak and Kirgegag Islands);

Hazy Islands Refuge;

Kenai National Moose Range;

Kodiak National Wildlife Refuge;

Nunivak Island Refuge;

St. Lazaria Island Refuge;

Semidi Islands Wildlife Refuge;

Tuxedni Refuge (Islands in Tuxedni Harbor);

[See conditional amendment of paragraph note.] Izembek Refuge, including the tide and submerged land described as follows:

Township 58 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian

Township 58 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian

Township 57 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian

Township 57 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian

Township 57 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian

Township 56 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian

Township 56 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian

Township 55 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian

Township 56 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian

Township 55 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian

Township 55 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian

Township 55 South, Range 86 West, Seward Meridian

Township 56 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian

Cape Newenham National Wildlife Range, including tide and submerged land in Chagvan Bay described as follows:

Township 16 South, Range 75 West, Seward Meridian

Township 16 South, Range 74 West, Seward Meridian

Clarence Rhodes National Wildlife Range;

Arctic National Wildlife Range.

[Repealed, § 3, ch 8 SLA 1988.]

The presently owned state land, tideland, submerged tideland, submerged land and water, and the land and water acquired in the future by the state lying within the parcels described in (1) — (2) of this subsection are established as the Goose Bay State Game Refuge:

Township 15 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 15 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within state-owned land specified in (c) of this section for inclusion in the Goose Bay State Game Refuge. The Department of Natural Resources may adopt, in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62), zoning regulations governing privately owned land within the Goose Bay State Game Refuge.

Egress and ingress to and from private property within the parcels described in (c) of this section shall be allowed through access corridors established through agreement between the Department of Natural Resources and the Department of Fish and Game, and with the private property owners involved.

Sections 1 — 4

Sections 9 — 12

Sections 1 — 9

Section 16

Section 13

Sections 24 — 26

Sections 35 — 36

Sections 1 — 36

Sections 5 — 6

Sections 1 — 6

Sections 10 — 11

Sections 1 — 23

Sections 27 — 32

Sections 1 — 36

Sections 1 — 36

Sections 1 — 36

Sections 1 — 36

Sections 6 — 7

Sections 18 — 19

Sections 30 — 31

(entire township);

Section 1

Sections 11 — 15

Sections 22 — 27

Sections 34 — 36

Sections 7 — 9

Sections 17 — 19

Section 30;

Sections 17 — 20, 29, 30: All;

Section 1: W1/2W1/2

Sections 2 — 3: All

Section 4: Lot 1, SE1/4NE1/4, E1/2SE1/4

Section 9: Lots 1, 2, 3, NE1/4NE1/4

Sections 10 — 11: All

Section 12: S1/2

Sections 13 — 15: All

Section 23: N1/2NE1/4

Section 24: All

The following protracted and fractional parts within Tract A:

Section 9: E1/2

Section 10: All

Section 15: All

Section 16: All

Section 21: N1/2

Section 22: N1/2.

History.

(§ 3 ch 114 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 140 SLA 1972; am § 28 ch 53 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 101 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 192 SLA 1975; am § 3 ch 8 SLA 1988)

Conditional amendment of paragraph (a)(14). —

Under § 2,
ch. 119, SLA 2010, paragraph (a)(14), describing the Izembek Refuge, is amended to read:

“(14) Izembek Refuge, including the tide and submerged land described as follows:

“(A) Township 58 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 4

“Sections 9 — 12

“(B) Township 58 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 9

“Section 16

“(C) Township 57 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian

“Section 13

“Sections 24 — 26

“Sections 35 — 36

“(D) Township 57 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(E) Township 57 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 5 — 6

“Section 12, N1/2, N1/2N1/2S1/2

“(F) Township 56 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 6

“Sections 10 — 11

“Sections 26 — 35

“(G) Township 56 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 23

“Section 25

“Sections 27 — 32

“Section 36

“(H) Township 55 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(I) Township 56 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(J) Township 55 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(K) Township 55 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(L) Township 55 South, Range 86 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 6 — 7

“Sections 18 — 19

“Sections 30 — 31

“(M) Township 56 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian (entire township)

“(N) Township 57 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 6;”.

The amendment described in § 2,
ch. 119, SLA 2010, takes effect under §§ 7(a) and 9,
ch. 119, SLA 2010, on the effective date of the exchange of land between the state and the United States Department of the Interior as described in § 4,
ch. 119, SLA 2010.
If, for reasons described in § 6,
ch. 119, SLA 2010, the land exchange is subsequently voided, then, under § 3,
ch. 119, SLA 2010, paragraph (a)(14) is amended to read:

“(14) Izembek Refuge, including the tide and submerged land described as follows:

“(A) Township 58 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 4

“Sections 9 — 12

“(B) Township 58 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 9

“Section 16

“(C) Township 57 South, Range 91 West, Seward Meridian

“Section 13

“Sections 24 — 26

“Sections 35 — 36

“(D) Township 57 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(E) Township 57 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 5 — 6

“(F) Township 56 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 6

“Sections 10 — 11

“(G) Township 56 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 23

“Sections 27 — 32

“(H) Township 55 South, Range 87 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(I) Township 56 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(J) Township 55 South, Range 89 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(K) Township 55 South, Range 88 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 1 — 36

“(L) Township 55 South, Range 86 West, Seward Meridian

“Sections 6 — 7

“Sections 18 — 19

“Sections 30 — 31

“(M) Township 56 South, Range 90 West, Seward Meridian (entire township);”.
The amendment described in § 3,
ch. 119, SLA 2010 takes effect under §§ 7(b) and 10 on the effective date that the executed land exchange between the state and the Department of the Interior is made null and void as described in § 6,
ch. 119, SLA 2010. As of May 2022, this condition had not been met.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose applicable to the amendment of the legal description to add state land and water to the Izembek State Game Refuge and to authorize a land exchange with the federal government affecting that refuge, see § 1, ch. 119, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.
For authorization for the proposed land exchange, a description of the land expected to be conveyed to and received by the state, and direction to the Department of Natural Resources to make the exchange without reference to requirements of AS 38.50, relating generally to exchanges of state land, see §§ 4 and 5, ch. 119, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.
For the terms and conditions applicable to the exchange of state land for federal land affecting the Izembek State Game Refuge and the conditions applicable if the land exchange is subsequently invalidated, see §§ 6 and 7, ch. 119, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 16.20.031.
Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge.

The following described state-owned land and water is established as the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge and shall be managed as a state game refuge for the protection of waterfowl, shorebirds, salmon, and other fish and wildlife species, and their habitat and for the use and enjoyment of the people of the state:

Township 13 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 13 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 12 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Township 12 North, Range 5 West, Seward Meridian

Township 12 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 11 North, Range 3 West, Seward Meridian

Township 11 North, Range 4 West, Seward Meridian

Except as provided in (d) of this section, the Department of Fish and Game and the Department of Natural Resources shall exercise their respective authorities over the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge consistent with a management plan prepared by the Department of Fish and Game in consultation with the Department of Natural Resources.

A public right-of-way for surface transportation and a utility corridor are created across state-owned land and water within the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge between the Anchorage mainland and Fire Island. The management plan prepared under (b) of this section shall identify the actual location on the land and water of the right-of-way and of the utility corridor between the Anchorage mainland and Fire Island.

Land owned by the Municipality of Anchorage that lies within the boundary of the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge described in (a) of this section may be included in the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge. An agreement between the Department of Fish and Game and the Municipality of Anchorage for the management of the land within the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge that is owned by the Municipality of Anchorage shall be approved by the Municipality of Anchorage and by the Department of Fish and Game.

The state or the Municipality of Anchorage may not acquire privately owned land within the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge described in (a) of this section by eminent domain for inclusion within the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge. The Department of Fish and Game or the Municipality of Anchorage may acquire privately owned land within the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge by purchase, exchange, or otherwise, except by eminent domain.

The land and water areas of the Anchorage Coastal Wildlife Refuge are closed to mineral entry under AS

38.05.185

—

38.05.275

.

Section 20: SE1/4 seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

SE1/4NE1/4 seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Section 29: E1/2 seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

SW1/4 seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Section 30: SE1/4SE1/4

Section 31: All seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour except NW1/4NW1/4

Section 32: All seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour;

Section 36: S1/2, S1/2N1/2;

Sections 6 — 9: Seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Section 15: NW1/4 seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

SW1/4NE1/4 seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Government Lot 5 and the remainder of the W1/2SE1/4, all SW1/4

Section 16: Seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Sections 17 — 22

Section 23: Government Lot 1 and the remainder of the SW1/4, all seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Government Lot 2 and the remainder of the S1/2NW1/4, all seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Government Lots 3 and 4, and the remainder of the SE1/4, all seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Section 24: Tract A, Shorecrest Subdivision (Plat No. 81-68, Anchorage Recording District)

Section 25: Government Lots 1 and 2, and the remainder of the W1/2, all

Tract A, Johns Park Estates, and the remainder of the NE1/4, excluding Skyway Park Estates, Addition No. 1 all seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Government Lots 3 and 4, and the remainder of the SE1/4, all

Sections 26 — 36;

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 11 — 14

Sections 23 — 26

Sections 35 — 36;

Section 29: That portion of the SW1/4 southwesterly of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way and southerly of Oceanview Subdivision, Addition No. 6

Section 30: That portion of Tract A, Johns Park Estates, seaward of the 20 foot elevation contour

Government Lot 2 and that portion of the SE1/4NW1/4 southwesterly of Oceanview West Subdivision, Addition No. 1

Government Lots 3 and 4 and the remainder of the SW1/4, all

That portion of the SW1/4NE1/4 and the SE1/4 southwesterly of Oceanview Subdivision, Addition No. 4 and Addition No. 6

Section 31

Section 32: All land southwesterly of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way

Section 33: All land westerly of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way;

Section 3: Government Lot 5

Section 4: That portion southwesterly of the Old Seward Highway right-of-way and The Landings Subdivision which is northeasterly of the New Seward Highway right-of-way

That portion southwesterly of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way

Sections 5 — 8

Section 9: That portion southwesterly of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way

That portion northeasterly of the New Seward Highway right-of-way

Section 10: That portion westerly of the Old Seward Highway right-of-way which is northeasterly of the New Seward Highway right-of-way

That portion southwesterly of the Alaska Railroad right-of-way;

Sections 1 — 4

Sections 10 — 12.

History.

(§ 1 ch 8 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

Sec. 16.20.032.
Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge.

The following state-owned land and water is established as the Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge:

Township 16 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 1 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Township 16 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Township 17 North, Range 2 West, Seward Meridian

Selections under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) are recognized as valid prior claims to the land within the area described in (a) of this section. Land specified in (a) of this section may not include land patented to a Native corporation under that Act.

Land selected by the Matanuska-Susitna Borough in Township 17, North Range 1 East S.M. shall be included in the Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge, subject to borough approval. If the borough relinquishes the selection of the land, the selected land becomes part of the Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within state-owned land specified in (c) of this section for inclusion in the Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge. The Department of Natural Resources may adopt, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), zoning regulations governing privately owned land within the Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (a) of this section, the land described in this subsection is excluded from the Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge established under (a) of this section for the establishment of a transportation and utility corridor. Land within the transportation and utility corridor that is determined by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities to be unnecessary for future transportation or utility corridors becomes a part of the Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge. The commissioner of transportation and public facilities is directed to provide access to the Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge during future development of state highways in the area. The land that is excluded from the Palmer Hay Flats State Game Refuge under this subsection is described as

Sections 1 — 12

Section 13: N1/2

Sections 14 — 18;

Section 25

Section 26: S1/2, S1/2 N1/2, N1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 NW1/4

Section 27: S1/2, SE1/4 NE1/4

Section 31: Lot 4, SE1/4, E1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 SW1/4, NE1/4

Section 32: S1/2, S1/2 NE1/4, NE1/4 NE1/4, SE1/4 NW1/4

Sections 33 — 36;

Section 19: Lots 3 and 4, E1/2 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4

Section 21: N1/2 SE1/4, S1/2 S1/2

Section 22:

excluding NW1/4 NW1/4

excluding N1/2 NE1/4 NW1/4

excluding NE1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4

excluding all portions of U.S. Survey No. 9024

Section 25: Lots 1 — 6, NW1/4, N1/2 NE1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4

Section 26: SE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2, excluding all portions of U.S. Survey No. 9024

Section 27: Lot 1, N1/2, N1/2 S1/2, SE1/4 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4

Section 28: Lots 1 — 2, N1/2, SW1/4, N1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 SE1/4

Section 29: N1/2, N1/2 SW1/4, SE1/4

Section 30: Lots 1 — 4, E1/2, E1/2 W1/2

Section 31: Lots 1 — 10, NE1/4 NW1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4, N1/2 NE1/4

Section 32: Lots 3 — 7, NE1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4, NE1/4 SE1/4

Section 33: Lots 5 — 9, S1/2 SE1/4, SW1/4 NW1/4, including all state tide and submerged land

Section 34: Lots 1 — 3, E1/2 NW1/4, SW1/4, E1/2, excluding all portions of U.S. Survey No. 9024

Section 35: Lots 1 — 5, NW1/4, N1/2 SW1/4, SW1/4 SW1/4, N1/2 NE1/4, SW1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4 SE1/4, excluding all portions of U.S. Survey No. 9024

Section 36: Lots 1 — 10, SE1/4 SW1/4, S1/2 SE1/4, NE1/4 SE1/4;

Sections 19 — 21: Tracts B and D, according to Plat No. 2012-110, Palmer Recording District;

U.S. Survey No. 1169: Lots 1 and 2, Block 31, within Section 26;

Sections 4 — 9

Section 17: N1/2

Section 18: N1/2

Section 2: That portion lying westerly of Lot 7 and Parcel F of U.S. Survey No. 9023

Section 3: That portion lying westerly of Lot 7, Lot 8, and Parcel F of U.S. Survey No. 9023

Section 10: That portion lying westerly of Lot 4, Lot 5, and Parcel C of U.S. Survey No. 9023

Section 15: That portion northerly of the left bank of the Knik River and lying westerly of Lot 3, Lot 4, and Parcel A of U.S. Survey No. 9023

Section 16: That portion northerly of the left bank of the Knik River;

Section 1: All, excluding South Hayfield Road right-of-way

Section 2: Lot 5

Section 11: Lots 1 and 3 — 6, N1/2 NE1/4

Section 12: Lots 1 — 4, N1/2 NW1/4, NE1/4 NE1/4;

Section 36: That portion of the S1/2 S1/2 lying easterly of the South Hayfield Road right-of-way

Township 17 North, Range 1 East, Seward Meridian

Section 22: SE1/4 NW1/4, W1/2 NE1/4, SE1/4 NE1/4, S1/2 NE1/4 NE1/4, NW1/4 NE1/4 NE1/4, NE1/4 SW1/4, W1/2 SE1/4

Sections 27 and 34: a corridor 300 feet on each side of the existing highway centerline.

History.

(§ 1 ch 102 SLA 1975; am §§ 2, 3 ch 49 SLA 1985; am § 28 ch 56 SLA 2005; am §§ 1, 2 ch 25 SLA 2015)

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and uncodified provisions of the 1985 amendatory Act, see §§ 1 and 4-6, ch. 49, SLA 1985 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective August 17, 2015, in paragraph (a)(3), added a reference to Section 21, added “excluding all portions of U.S. Survey No. 9024” at the end of Sections 22, 26, 34, 35, added “N 1/2, SW 1/4,” in Section 28, substituted “Section 29: N 1/2, N 1/2 SW 1/4, SE 1/4” for “, S 1/2 SW 1/4”, added (a)(4) and (a)(5) and redesignated the following paragraphs accordingly, in (a)(7), rewrote Section 2, added (a)(8) and (a)(9), substituted “each side” for “either side” in Sections 27 an 34 of (e).

Sec. 16.20.033.
Yakataga State Game Refuge.

The following state-owned land and water and all land acquired in the future by the state lying within the parcels described in this subsection are established as the Yakataga State Game Refuge:

Township 20 South, Range 13 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 20 South, Range 14 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 20 South, Range 15 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 20 South, Range 16 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 21 South, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 21 South, Range 111/2 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 21 South, Range 12 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 21 South, Range 13 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 21 South, Range 14 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 21 South, Range 15 East, Copper River Meridian

Township 21 South, Range 16 East, Copper River Meridian

The Yakataga State Game Refuge is established to protect the

fish and wildlife habitat and populations, including salmon spawning and rearing habitat and critical goat and moose winter habitat;

public uses of fish and wildlife and their habitat, particularly commercial, sport, and subsistence fishing, hunting, viewing, photography, and general public recreation in a high quality environment; and

the use and disposition of other resources when the activities are not inconsistent with (1) and (2) of this subsection.

The department shall permit timber harvest activities in the area east of the Kaliakh River when the activities are not inconsistent with (b)(1) of this section.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain private land that is located within the state-owned land specified in (a) of this section for inclusion in the Yakataga State Game Refuge. The state may acquire private land that is located within the state-owned land specified in (a) of this section by purchase, exchange, or otherwise from willing owners for inclusion in the Yakataga State Game Refuge.

The establishment of the Yakataga State Game Refuge under this section does not impair or alter valid existing rights including pending Native allotment applications, access to set net sites, and access to and from private land located within the Yakataga State Game Refuge.

The department shall allow commercial, sport, and subsistence fishing and hunting within the Yakataga State Game Refuge under regulations of the Board of Fisheries and the Board of Game. The department shall also permit associated support activities when necessary and consistent with AS

16.20.010

—

16.20.080

to support fishing and hunting permitted under this section, including fish buying operations, aircraft support including landing strips, and off-road vehicle use.

Egress and ingress to and from private property within the parcels described in (a) of this section shall be allowed through access corridors established by agreement between the department, the Department of Natural Resources, and the owners of private land involved. The establishment of the Yakataga State Game Refuge does not impair or alter existing rights of access to set net lease sites.

The department shall adopt and may revise a management plan for the Yakataga State Game Refuge.

Section 11: SE1/4

Section 12: S1/2

Section 13

Section 14: E1/2

Sections 22 — 27

Sections 34 — 36;

Sections 7 — 12: S1/2

Sections 13 — 36;

Sections 7 — 12: S1/2

Sections 13 — 36;

Sections 7 — 9: S1/2

Sections 16 — 36;

Excluding that portion of Tract A-148 lying north and west of Seal River:

Sections 1 — 2

Sections 3 — 4: North and east of the Seal River and its associated lake system

Section 10: East of Seal River and one mile north of mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska

Sections 11 — 12

Sections 13 — 14: above mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska;

Sections 6 — 7

Section 18: Above mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska;

Sections 13 — 14: S1/2

Sections 23 — 26

Sections 35 — 36: Above mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska;

Sections 1 — 21

Section 22: W1/2, E1/2 one mile north of mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska

Sections 23 — 24: One mile north of mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska;

Sections 1 — 12

Sections 13 — 15: One mile north of mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska

Sections 16 — 18

Sections 19 — 22: One mile north of mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska;

Sections 1 — 7

Sections 8 — 12: One mile north of mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska;

Sections 1 — 6

Sections 7 — 12: One mile north of mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska.

History.

(§ 1 ch 143 SLA 1990)

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning the area plan for the Yakataga area, litigation relating to land in the Yakataga area, and legislative intent in establishing the Yakataga State Game Refuge, see §§ 4 — 6 and 9, ch. 143, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.

Editor’s notes. —

Sections 2, 3, and 7,
ch. 143, SLA 1990, provide: “Sec. 2.
AS

16.20.033(a)(5)

is amended to read:

“(5) Township 21 South, Range 11 East, Copper River Meridian Tract A-148 lying north and west of Seal River

“Sections 1 — 2

“Sections 3 — 4: North and east of the Seal River and its associated lake system

“Section 10: East of Seal River and one mile north of mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska

“Sections 11 — 12

“Sections 13 — 14: Above mean high tide line on the Gulf of Alaska.”

“Sec. 3.
AS

16.20.033(a)

is amended by adding new paragraphs to read:

“(12) Township 21 South, Range 9 East, Copper River Meridian Tract A-148

“(13) Township 21 South, Range 10 East, Copper River Meridian Tract A-148.”

“Sec. 7. Sections 2 — 3 of this Act take effect on the effective date of an appropriation Act appropriating to the University of Alaska those amounts necessary to compensate the university for the agreed value reached under § 5(b) of this Act for the interest of the university in Tract A-148 at Cape Suckling after crediting to the university those amounts received by the university under § 5(c) and (d) of this Act.” As of May 2022, the contingency described in § 7 had not occurred and did not appear likely to occur.

Section 9, ch. 143, SLA 1990 provides that the area described in this section that is east of the Kaliakh River shall be included in the Yakataga State Game Refuge only if and to the extent that the area plan prepared by the commissioner of natural resources under § 4 of this Act contains a recommendation of the commissioner to include that area within the Yakataga State Game Refuge. Until the commissioner issues an area plan under § 4 of this Act, the area east of the Kaliakh River shall be described as the Yakataga Special Management Area and managed by the commissioner of natural resources.

In the Alaska Department of Natural Resources’ Yakataga Area Plan, adopted April 1995, the commissioner of DNR recommended inclusion of the former Special Management Area in the Yakataga State Game Refuge, and the plan declared that the Special Management Area expired when DNR adopted the area plan.

Sec. 16.20.034.
Mendenhall Wetlands State Game Refuge.

The following state-owned land, including tide and submerged land, and excluding privately owned land, is established as the Mendenhall Wetlands State Game Refuge: Beginning at U.S.C.G.S. Triangulation Station “Salmon” located on the northeastern shore of Douglas Island, lying within the City and Borough of Juneau, First Judicial District, State of Alaska; thence northeasterly across Gastineau Channel approximately .5 miles to U.S.C.G.S. Triangulation Station “Creek”, said station being on the shore of Gastineau Channel, 200 feet south of Salmon Creek; thence trend northerly to the intersection of Egan Drive and Salmon Creek; thence trend northwesterly immediately adjacent to but not upon or within the designated right-of-way of Egan Drive approximately 2.7 miles to the intersection with the easterly boundary of Sunny Point Park Subdivision, recorded as Plat No. 333; thence southerly along said boundary; thence along said right-of-way line to the intersection with the 22.7 foot extreme high tide line; thence southerly and westerly on said 22.7 foot extreme high tide line, abutting said Sunny Point Park Subdivision, U.S. Survey 2475, Sunny Point Subdivision (Plat No. 307), and Egan Drive approximately one mile to the easterly line of the accreted property to the U.S. Survey No. 1568; thence southerly and westerly, along the boundary of said accreted property approximately .4 miles to Corner No. 14 of Alaska Tidelands Survey No. 716; thence southerly and westerly along the west meander line of U.S. Survey No. 716, approximately 2.6 miles to Corner No. 4 of said Tidelands Survey; thence northerly along the west meander line of U.S. Survey No. 1742, approximately 790 feet to the northwesterly corner of Juneau Airport property (Corner No. AP-4 of survey dated 6-69); thence northwesterly approximately 440 feet to the southerly meander line of U.S. Survey No. 1919; thence southerly and westerly, along the southerly meanders of U.S. Surveys No. 1919 and No. 1042 (as accreted), approximately .5 miles to the intersection with the south line of U.S. Survey No. 2136; thence westerly, along said south line, approximately .6 miles to the intersection with the 22.7 foot extreme high tide line; thence southerly, along said line approximately 1.4 miles to U.S.C.G.S. Triangulation Station “Glacier” on the southerly tip of Mendenhall Peninsula; thence in a southerly direction across Gastineau Channel approximately 1.3 miles to the mouth of Cove Creek; thence in a general easterly direction along the 22.7 foot extreme high tide line of Douglas Island approximately 9 miles to U.S.C.G.S. Triangulation Station “Salmon”, the true point of beginning.

The state may not acquire by eminent domain privately owned land within or abutting state-owned land described in (a) of this section for inclusion in the Mendenhall Wetlands State Game Refuge but may acquire privately owned land by purchase, exchange, or otherwise for inclusion in the Mendenhall Wetlands State Game Refuge.

Leases, permits, and applications for leases or permits in effect or submitted by January 1, 1976 are not affected by the provisions of this section. Renewals of leases or permits after January 1, 1976 are subject to this section.

Egress and ingress across state land to and from private property within or abutting the land described in (a) of this section shall be allowed through access corridors established through agreement between the department and the private property owners affected.

Except within that portion of the Mendenhall Wetlands State Game Refuge commonly known as the Twin Lakes area, the boundaries of which shall be established by the department after consultation with the City and Borough of Juneau, the taking of game is expressly permitted within the land described in (a) of this section if consistent with the management plan adopted by the department and conducted under regulations adopted by the board.

Recreational activity is expressly permitted within the land described in (a) of this section if consistent with the management plan adopted by the department and conducted under regulations adopted by the board.

Management of the surface and subsurface estate is the responsibility of the Department of Natural Resources. Any actions by the Department of Natural Resources which affect the habitat shall be in conformity with a plan proposed and adopted by the Department of Fish and Game, after reasonable public hearings, and following consultation with the City and Borough of Juneau. The plan shall be revised annually, if necessary and appropriate, under the same procedures followed for initial adoption.

An activity or use may not occur under this section in a manner that creates a hazard to aircraft. Gravel extraction is not considered an incompatible activity on or abutting state-owned land described in (a) of this section and is subject to provisions of the management plan. Except for those ponds, lakes, or other bodies of water adjacent to the airport that are required to be maintained by the City and Borough of Juneau as a seaplane basin under certification for the Juneau Municipal Airport granted by the Federal Aviation Agency, if requested by the City and Borough of Juneau the Departments of Fish and Game and Natural Resources shall assist in filling the ponds, lakes, or other bodies of water adjacent to the existing airport runway to eliminate them as sites attractive to waterfowl.

The management plan adopted under (g) of this section must include provisions under which the City and Borough of Juneau may acquire land, by sale, exchange, or otherwise, for purposes of expanding the Juneau Municipal Airport, establishing additional transportation corridors, including water corridors, and establishing publicly owned and operated docking facilities, and these uses are considered preferential under art. VIII of the state constitution but subject to the requirements for plan specification and approval under AS

16.20.060

. A deed, contract of sale, lease, or other instrument evidencing disposition by the Department of Natural Resources of land under this subsection must include, among other terms, the condition that the land is restricted to use for airport expansion, establishing additional transportation corridors, including water corridors, and establishing publicly owned and operated docking facilities.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (d) — (i) of this section, if the City and Borough of Juneau demonstrates to the Departments of Natural Resources and Fish and Game, jointly, that there is a superior public need for or use of the land to its use as a state game refuge, after public hearing and a finding by the departments supporting the determination that such a need or use exists or is required, the use shall be permitted. A final administrative order, ruling, or determination by the departments adverse to the petition of the City and Borough of Juneau is subject to judicial review under AS

44.62.560

—

44.62.570

.

Nothing in this section prevents the City and Borough of Juneau from exercising its land selection rights to state land within its boundaries under applicable law, providing the selection is by local ordinance.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, “(a) of ” was deleted preceding “this section” in the first sentence of (h) of this section to correct a manifest error in § 1, ch. 45, SLA 1976.

Administrative Code. —

For restricted areas, see 5 AAC 92, art. 12.

For state game refuges, see 5 AAC 95, art. 5.